Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 1. General Benefits
§ 1364.
Replacement.

This State shall replace any monies received after July 1, 1941, from the Secretary of Labor under Title III of the Social Security Act, any unencumbered balances in the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund as of that date, any monies thereafter granted to this State pursuant to the provisions of the Wagner-Peyser Act, and any monies made available by the State or its political subdivisions and matched by such monies granted to this State pursuant to the provisions of the Wagner-Peyser Act, which the Secretary of Labor finds after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing to the Commissioner have, because of any action or contingency, been lost or have been expended for purposes other than, or in amounts in excess of, those found necessary by the Secretary of Labor for the proper administration of this chapter.
In the event that there are insufficient funds in the Contingent Fund as provided in section 1365 of this title, such monies shall be promptly replaced by monies appropriated for such purpose from the general funds of this State to the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund for expenditure as provided in sections 1362 and 1363 of this title.
The Commissioner shall promptly report to the Governor, and the Governor to the General Assembly, the amount required for such replacement.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1365.
Contingent Fund.

There is hereby created a special fund to be known as the Contingent Fund.
All interest, fines, and penalties collected under the provisions of the unemployment compensation law after April 1, 1947, together with any voluntary contributions tendered as a contribution to this Fund, shall be paid into this Fund.
Such monies shall not be expended or available for expenditures in any manner which would permit their substitution for, or a corresponding reduction in, federal funds which would in the absence of such monies be available to finance expenditures for the administration of the unemployment compensation law.
But nothing in this chapter shall prevent such monies from being used as a revolving fund to cover expenditures, necessary and proper under the law for which federal funds have been duly requested but not yet received, subject to the charging of such expenditures against such funds when received.
The monies in this Fund shall be used by the Commissioner for the payment of costs of administration which are found not to have been properly and validly chargeable against federal grants, or other funds, received for or in the Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund on or after January 1, 1947.
No expenditure of the Fund shall be made unless and until the Commissioner finds that no other funds are available or can properly be used to finance such expenditures.
The State Treasurer shall co-sign all expenditures from this Fund authorized by the Commissioner.
The monies in this Fund are hereby specifically made available to replace, within a reasonable time, any monies received by this State pursuant to section 302 of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, which because of any action or contingency, have been lost or have been expended for purposes other than, or in amounts in excess of, those necessary for the proper administration of the unemployment compensation law.
The monies in this Fund shall be continuously available to the Commissioner for expenditure in accordance with the provisions of this section and shall not lapse at any time or be transferred to any other fund except as herein provided.
Provided, however, that on December 31 of each year all monies in excess of $10,000.00 in this Fund shall be transferred to the Unemployment Compensation Fund.
On or before March 31 of each year, an audit of this Fund will be completed and a report of that audit will be made public. In the event that a refund of interest, a fine, or a penalty is found necessary, and such interest, fine, or penalty has been deposited in the Contingent Fund, such refund shall be made from the Contingent Fund.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1983, No. 16

, § 8, eff. April 4, 1983;

1985, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 16, 1986.

§ 1366.
Protection of rights and benefits; waiver of rights void.

No agreement by an employee to waive his or her right to benefit or any other right under this chapter shall be valid.

§ 1367.
Benefits not subject to assignment or trustee process.

Benefits which are due or may become due under this chapter shall not be assignable before payment, but this provision shall not affect the survival thereof; and when awarded, adjudged, or paid shall be exempt from all claims of creditors, and from levy, execution, attachment, and trustee process or other remedy now or hereafter provided for recovery or collection of debt.
This exemption may not be waived.

§ 1367a.
Child support intercept of unemployment benefits.

An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall, at the time of filing such claim, disclose whether or not the individual owes child support obligations as defined under subsection (f) of this section. If any such individual discloses that he or she owes child support obligations and is determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation, the Commissioner shall notify the state or local child support enforcement agency enforcing such obligation that the individual has been determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 1366 and 1367 of this title, the Commissioner shall deduct and withhold from any unemployment compensation payable to an individual who owes child support obligations as defined under subsection (f) of this section:

the amount specified by the individual to the Commissioner to be deducted and withheld under this subsection if neither subdivision (2) nor (3) of this subsection is applicable; or

the amount (if any) determined pursuant to an agreement submitted to the Commissioner under Section 454(20)(B)(i) of the Social Security Act by the state or local child support enforcement agency, unless subdivision (3) of this subsection is applicable; or

any amount otherwise required to be so deducted and withheld from such unemployment compensation pursuant to legal process (as that term is defined in Section 462(e) of the Social Security Act) properly served upon the Commissioner.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection (b) of this section shall be paid by the Commissioner to the appropriate state or local child support enforcement agency.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection (b) of this section shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and paid by such individual to the state or local child support enforcement agency in satisfaction of the individual’s child support obligations.

For purposes of this section, the term “unemployment compensation” means any compensation payable under the state law (including amounts payable by the commissioner pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment).

The term “child support obligations” is defined for purposes of these provisions as including only obligations which are being enforced pursuant to a plan described in Section 454 of the Social Security Act which has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human Services under part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act.

The term “state or local child support enforcement agency” as used in this section means any agency of a state or political subdivision thereof operating pursuant to a plan described in subsection (f) of this section.

The Commissioner shall implement the provisions of this section only if appropriate arrangements have been made for full reimbursement by the state or local child support enforcement agency for all administrative costs incurred by the Commissioner under this section which are attributable to child support obligations being enforced by the state or local child support enforcement agency.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Sept. 26, 1982.

§ 1367b.
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program intercept of unemployment benefits.

An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall, at the time of filing such claim, disclose whether he or she owes an uncollected overissuance of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits as defined in

7 U.S.C. § 2022(c)

(1). The Commissioner shall notify the State agency administering the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program enforcing such obligation of any individual who discloses that he or she owes an uncollected overissuance of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits and who is determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 1366 and 1367 of this title, the Commissioner shall deduct and withhold from any unemployment compensation payable to an individual who owes an uncollected overissuance of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Benefits:

the amount specified by the individual to the Commissioner to be deducted and withheld under this section;

the amount, if any, determined pursuant to an agreement submitted to the State agency administering the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program under

7 U.S.C. § 2022(c)

(3)(A); or

any amount otherwise required to be deducted and withheld from unemployment compensation pursuant to

7 U.S.C. § 2022(c)

(3)(B).

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection (b) of this section shall be paid by the Commissioner to the appropriate State agency administering the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection (b) of this section shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and paid by such individual to the State agency administering the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program as repayment of the individual’s uncollected overissuance of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits.

As used in this section, the term “unemployment compensation” means any compensation payable under this chapter and any federal benefit payments made pursuant to agreements with the U.S. Department of Labor.

This section applies only if arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the State agency administering the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program for the administrative costs incurred by the Commissioner under this section which are attributable to the repayment of uncollected overissuances of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits to the State agency administering the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.

Any deduction and withholding authorized by this section shall not exceed 25 percent of the individual’s weekly benefit amount.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 126, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 1368.
False statements to increase payments.

A person shall not willfully and intentionally make a false statement or representation to obtain or increase any benefit or other payment under this chapter, either for himself, herself, or any other person.

§ 1369.
False statements to avoid unemployment program obligations.

A person who willfully makes a material false statement or representation to avoid becoming or remaining subject to this chapter, or to avoid or reduce a contribution or other payment required of an employer under this chapter for either herself or himself or for any other person, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 1370.
Furnishing reports.

A person shall not willfully fail or refuse to furnish any reports duly required under this chapter or to submit his or her records to inspection when duly required under this chapter, or to make or require any deduction from wages to pay all or any portion of the contributions required from employers.

§ 1371.
Each statement separate offense.

Each such false statement or representation, and each day of such failure or refusal and each such deduction from wages as provided in this section and sections 1369 and 1370 of this title shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.

§ 1372.
Violation by corporate agent.

If the employer in question is a corporation, any official or agent thereof responsible for such falsehood, failure, or refusal mentioned in sections 1369-1371 of this title shall be subject to the penalties provided in section 1373 of this title.

§ 1373.
General penalty; civil.

A person who violates a provision of this chapter or any lawful rule or regulation of the Board, for which no other penalty is provided, shall be assessed an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

2009, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 1374.
Representation in court.

The Attorney General shall represent the Commissioner and State in any court action relating to this chapter or to its administration and enforcement, except as other counsel may be designated by the Commissioner with the approval of the Attorney General; provided however, in prosecutions under this chapter the State’s Attorney of the county wherein such offense occurs shall represent the State as in other causes.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1375.
Jurisdiction.

Concurrent jurisdiction of offenses under this chapter is vested in the Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 1376.
Limitation of liability of State.

Benefits shall be deemed to be due and payable under this chapter only to the extent provided in this chapter and to the extent that monies are available therefor to the credit of the Unemployment Compensation Fund.
Neither the State nor the Commissioner shall be liable for any amount in excess of such sums.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1377.
Rights hereunder subject to legislative control.

All the rights, privileges, or immunities conferred by this chapter or by acts done pursuant hereto shall exist subject to the power of the General Assembly to amend or repeal this chapter at any time; and there shall be no vested rights of any kind against such amendment or repeal or the termination of this chapter or the subdivisions of any of its provisions by its own terms.

§ 1378.
Requirements for obtaining license or governmental contract.

For purposes of this section, “agency” means any unit of State government, including agencies, departments, boards, commissions, authorities, or public corporations.

[Repealed.]

Every agency shall, upon request, furnish to the Commissioner a list of licenses and contracts issued or renewed by such agency during the reporting period; provided, however, that the Secretary of State shall, with respect to certificates of authority to transact business issued to foreign corporations, furnish to the Commissioner only those certificates originally issued by the Secretary of State during the reporting period and not renewals of such certificates. The lists should include the name, address, Social Security or federal identification number of such licensee or provider, and such other information as the Commissioner may require.

If the Commissioner determines that any employing unit that has agreed to furnish goods, services, or real estate space to any agency has neglected or refused to pay contributions or payments in lieu of contributions and that the employing unit’s liability for such contributions or payments in lieu of contributions is not under appeal, the Commissioner shall notify the agency and the employing unit in writing of the amount owed by such employing unit. Upon receipt of such notice, the agency shall thereafter transfer to the Commissioner any amounts that would otherwise be payable by the agency to the employing unit, up to the amount certified by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may treat any such payment as if it were a payment received from the employing unit.

No agency of the State shall make final payment of any amount owed under a contract that contemplates the employment of any employing unit within the State or the use of any property within the State, or otherwise release any employing unit from the obligations of any such contract, unless such employing unit shall first obtain a certificate issued by the Commissioner that the employing unit is in good standing with respect to or in full compliance with a plan to pay any and all contributions or payments in lieu of contributions due as of the date of issuance of the certificate.

Upon written request by the Commissioner and after notice and hearing to the employing unit as required under any applicable provision of law, an agency shall revoke or suspend any license or other authority to conduct a trade or business (including a license to practice a profession) issued to any employing unit if the agency finds that contributions or payments in lieu of contributions have not been paid and the employing unit’s liability for contributions or payments in lieu of contributions is not under appeal. For purposes of such findings, the written representation to that effect by the Commissioner to the agency shall constitute prima facie evidence thereof. The Commissioner shall have the right to intervene in any hearing conducted with respect to such license revocation or suspension. Any findings made by the agency with respect to such license revocation or suspension shall be made only for the purposes of such proceeding and shall not be relevant to or introduced in any other proceeding at law, except for any appeal from such license revocation or suspension. Any license or certificate of authority suspended or revoked under this section shall not be reissued or renewed until the agency receives a certificate issued by the Commissioner that the applicable employing unit is in good standing with respect to any and all contributions or payments in lieu of contributions payable to the Commissioner as of the date of issuance of such certificate. Any person aggrieved by the decision of the agency may appeal therefrom in accordance with the provisions of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25.

For the purposes of this section, a person is in good standing with respect to any and all contributions or payments in lieu of contributions payable if:
(g) (1) For the purposes of this section, a person is in good standing with respect to any and all contributions or payments in lieu of contributions payable if:

no contributions or payments in lieu of contributions are due and payable;

the liability for any contributions or payments in lieu of contributions due and payable is on appeal;

the employing unit is in compliance with a payment plan approved by the Commissioner; or

in the case of a licensee, the agency finds that requiring immediate payment of contributions or payments in lieu of contributions due and payable would impose an unreasonable hardship.

If the agency finds an unreasonable hardship, it may condition renewal on terms that will place the person in good standing with respect to any and all contributions or payments in lieu of contributions as soon as reasonably possible.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; amended

2009, No. 42

, §§ 33b, 33c;

2017, No. 74

, § 54.

§ 1379. Section 1379 repealed effective July 1, 2026. Complaint of misclassification; enforcement by Attorney General.

Following the referral of a complaint by the Commissioner of Labor pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title, the Attorney General may investigate a complaint that an employing unit or employer has committed a willful, substantial, or systemic violation of section 1314a of this chapter by failing to properly classify one or more employees and may enforce the provisions of this chapter by restraining prohibited acts, seeking civil penalties, obtaining assurances of discontinuance, and conducting civil investigations in accordance with the procedures established in

9 V.S.A. §§ 2458

-2461

as though the misclassification of an employee is an unfair act in commerce. Any employing unit or employer complained against shall have the same rights and remedies as specified in

9 V.S.A. §§ 2458

-2461

. The Superior Court may impose the same civil penalties and investigation costs and order other relief to the State of Vermont or an aggrieved employee for the misclassification of an employee and any related violations of the provisions of this chapter as they are authorized to impose or order under the provisions of 9 V.S.A. §§ 2458 and 2461 in an unfair act in commerce. In addition, the Superior Court may order restitution of wages or other benefits on behalf of an employee and may order reinstatement and other appropriate relief on behalf of an employee.

The Attorney General shall share information and coordinate investigatory and enforcement resources with the Departments of Financial Regulation, of Labor, and of Taxes pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title.
(b) (1) The Attorney General shall share information and coordinate investigatory and enforcement resources with the Departments of Financial Regulation, of Labor, and of Taxes pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title.

Upon receiving notice that the Attorney General has determined that an employing unit or employer has committed a violation of section 1314a of this chapter by failing to properly classify one or more employees, the Commissioners of Financial Regulation and of Taxes shall review whether the employing unit or employer is in compliance with the insurance or tax laws that are under their jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Feb. 20, 2020; repealed on July 1, 2026 by

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 11(b).

§ 1380.
Repealed.
1977, No. 64, § 25(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1978.

§ 1381.
Repealed.
1987, No. 100, § 5.

§ 1382.
Repealed.
1977, No. 64, § 25(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1978.

§ 1383.
Severability of provisions.

It is hereby declared to be the purpose and intention of the General Assembly that the provisions of this chapter are severable and that the invalidity or ineffectiveness of any provision or provisions of such chapter shall not affect the validity or operative force of the remainder of the chapter except only that it is the legislative intent that the whole chapter shall fail if any one or more of the following and only of the following provisions, are finally determined to be invalid and ineffective:

the exaction of contributions from employers as provided in sections 1321-1327 of this title;

the requirement contained in section 1359 of this title providing for the deposit with the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States of all monies received in the Unemployment Fund and the use of monies requisitioned from the Secretary of the Treasury;

the provisions of subdivision 1344 (a)(2)(C)-(E) of section 1344 of this title relating to the denial of compensation upon refusal to accept new work under certain circumstances;

the provisions of section 1377 of this title barring vested rights under this chapter;

the provisions of sections 1386-1388 of this title with respect to suspension or termination of operation of this chapter or parts thereof in the event of modification or invalidity of the Act of Congress designated as the Social Security Act.

§ 1384.
Construction.

This chapter is declared to be enacted in correlation with Titles III and IX of the Act of Congress approved August 14, 1935, designated as the Social Security Act, and with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, and the expediency of certain provisions of this chapter depend as hereinafter set forth upon the scope and operation within this State of the provisions of said titles and of said act as originally enacted or as hereafter amended.
If the Federal Unemployment Tax Act shall be interpreted or extended to impose within this State a tax with respect to employing units having in their employ less than four persons, or with respect to employing units having in their employ individuals who are not now in “employment” as defined in subdivision 1301(6)(C) of this title the Governor by proclamation within 10 days of the effective date of said extension shall so declare and thereupon and thereafter the word “employer” and the words “individual in employment,” as used in this chapter shall extend to and include in the first instance all employing units having in their employ such smaller number of persons and the individuals in their employ, and in the second instance all employing units having in their employ individuals who thereafter shall be in “employment” and the individuals in their employ.
Said persons shall be treated as individuals in the employ of said employer with respect to contributions and eligibility for benefits under this chapter.

§ 1385.
Contingent provisions.

If the Federal Unemployment Tax Act has been or shall be amended, interpreted, or extended so that employing units not heretofore included under the definition of “employer,” as that term is used in this chapter, are included under such definition after said Act of Congress is so amended, interpreted, or extended, then, subject to other provisions of this chapter benefits shall become payable to any individual on the basis of wages earned in the employ of such newly defined employer, and such wages shall be available to any individual for determining his or her eligibility for benefits after the effective date of such extension, or after the date when such newly defined employer’s approved election to be so defined shall have made him or her subject to this chapter, and the benefit year of such individual shall have begun subsequent to the date such newly defined employer became subject to this chapter.

§ 1386.
Operation dependent upon federal act.

It is hereby declared to be the legislative judgment that the expediency and beneficial operation of this chapter are dependent upon the effective operation within this State of certain sections of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, and amendments thereto: (1) section 3301 of said Act imposing an excise tax upon employers as defined in said Act; (2) section 3302 allowing against said tax credits for contributions exacted of employers for an unemployment fund whether or not exacted in full of the particular taxpayer under certain circumstances; (3) section 3303 prescribing the conditions upon which said credits may be allowed in addition to actual payments by said taxpayer; (4) sections 3303 and 3304 requiring the certification for the purpose of said credits of state law and prescribing the conditions precedent of such certification.
If any of said sections shall be repealed, amended, suspended, or finally declared invalid so as to deprive a contributor under this act of credits against the excise tax against him or her under said section 3301 of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, then any contribution required by this chapter, to the extent that by reason of said repeal, amendment, suspension, or declared invalidity of said federal act, a contributor is deprived of the benefit of such credit, shall be suspended as provided in section 1387 of this title.

§ 1387.
Suspension of contributions.

Whenever the Governor shall determine that the conditions of suspension of the contributions required by this chapter, as hereinbefore defined, exist by reason of any repeal, amendment, suspension, or declared invalidity of the federal Social Security Act or the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, he or she shall so declare by proclamation and thereupon the suspension hereinbefore provided shall become effective and continue for a period of two years from said date, subject to such legislative amendment, modification, or repeal as may be enacted within said period.

§ 1388.
Invalidity of acts.

If the federal Social Security Act
or the Federal Unemployment Tax Act
shall be finally held and determined to be wholly invalid or shall be repealed, then this chapter shall become wholly inoperative and ineffective except only that thereafter the Commissioner shall continue in office for the purpose of:

recovering any monies on deposit with the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States and the redistribution to contributors of all monies on hand in proportion to contributions received, said redistribution to be under the direction of a presiding judge of a Superior Court upon an action brought by the Commissioner against five or more employers; and

doing any other act or thing necessary or proper to liquidate assets and discharge obligations of the office.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. March 1, 1961;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961.

§ 1389.
Repealed.
1977, No. 25(a), eff. Jan. 1, 1978.